Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.08
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Hunger-Free Schools Act.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 8.
July 18, 2026